Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF64.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1165YH (5) 91 as/js H.F. 64 Section 1. Section 728.2, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 728.2 Dissemination and exhibition of obscene material to 3 minors. 4 Any person, other than the parent or guardian of the minor, 5 who knowingly disseminates or exhibits obscene material to a 6 minor, including the exhibition of obscene material so that 7 it can be observed by a minor on or off the premises where it 8 is displayed, is guilty of a public offense and shall upon 9 conviction be guilty of a serious misdemeanor class âDâ felony . 10